Alabama, session 2026rs, SB274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
32 Section 1. Sections 34-7B-1 and 34-7B-13, Code of
33 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
34 "§34-7B-1
35 For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms
36 shall have the following meanings:
37 (1) APPRENTICE. Any person engaged in learning the
38 practices defined in this article including, but not limited
39 to, assisting in the performance of any acts of barbering or
40 cosmetology on the general public under the constant and
41 direct supervision of a person who has held a valid current
42 license issued by the board for at least five years, in a shop
43 licensed by the board.
44 (2) BARBERING. The occupation of shaving or trimming
45 the beard,; cutting or dressing the hair,; giving facial or
46 scalp massages,; giving facial or scalp treatment with oils or
47 creams or other preparations made for that purpose, either by
48 hand or by means of mechanical appliances,; singeing and
49 shampooing the hair,; dyeing the hair,; or permanently waving
50 or straightening the hair of any living or deceased person for
51 compensation, as performed by a Class 2 barber.
52 (3) BLOW-DRY STYLING. The practice of cleansing,
53 conditioning, drying, arranging, curling, straightening, or
54 styling the hair using only mechanical devices, brushes,
55 combs, hair sprays, and topical agents, including balms, oils,
56 and serums. The term does not include cutting, coloring,
Page 2

and serums. The term does not include cutting, coloring,
SB274 INTRODUCED
57 bleaching, relaxing, permanent waving, or the use of chemical
58 treatments to alter the structure of the hair.
59 (4) BOARD. The Alabama Board of Cosmetology and
60 Barbering.
61 (4)(5) CLASS 1 BARBER. A person who only does the
62 following in his or her ordinary course of business: Arranges,
63 cleans, cuts, or singes the hair of any person or massages,
64 cleans, stimulates, exercises, or does similar work on the
65 scalp, face, or neck of any person with the hands, or with
66 mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliance, or by the use
67 of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or
68 creams. Any one or a combination of the following practices,
69 when done upon the human body above the seventh cervical
70 vertebra for cosmetic purposes and not for the treatment of
71 disease or physical or mental ailments,; and when done for
72 payment, directly or indirectly or without payment for the
73 public generally: Shaving or trimming the beard or trimming
74 the hair.
75 (5)(6) CLASS 2 BARBER. Any person, other than a student
76 or apprentice, who performs barbering on the general public
77 for compensation, and who shall satisfy the qualifications and
78 licensure requirements provided in this chapter for a Class 2
79 barber. For the purposes of this chapter, the term barber,
80 standing alone, shall be deemed a reference to a Class 2
81 barber.
82 (6)(7) COSMETOLOGIST. Any person, other than a student
83 or apprentice, who performs cosmetology on the general public
84 for compensation, and who shall satisfysatisfies the
Page 3

for compensation, and who shall satisfysatisfies the
SB274 INTRODUCED
85 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
86 article for a cosmetologist.
87 (7)(8) COSMETOLOGY. Any of the practices generally
88 recognized as beauty culture, hairdressing, or any other
89 designation engaged in by any person who performs such on the
90 general public for compensation including, but not limited to,
91 cleansing, singeing, cutting, arranging, dressing, curling,
92 braiding, waxing, bleaching, weaving, coloring the hair by
93 hand or mechanical apparatus,; the use of creams, lotions, or
94 cosmetic preparations, with or without massage, on the scalp,
95 face, arms, legs, feet, or hands,; esthetics practices,; nail
96 technology,; manicure,; pedicure,; or desairology.
97 (8)(9) ESTHETICIAN. Any person, other than a student or
98 apprentice, who performs esthetics on the general public for
99 compensation, and who shall satisfysatisfies the
100 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
101 article for an esthetician.
102 (9)(11) ESTHETICS. The practice of performing acts of
103 skin care including, but not limited to, facials, body waxing,
104 makeup, and general esthetics procedures on the general public
105 for compensation.
106 (10)(12) ESTHETICS/MANICURE. A combination of the
107 practices of esthetics and manicure.
108 (11)(10) ESTHETICIAN/MANICURIST. Any person, other than
109 a student or apprentice, who performs a combination of the
110 practices of esthetics and manicure on the general public for
111 compensation, and who shall satisfysatisfies the
112 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
Page 4

qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
SB274 INTRODUCED
113 article for an esthetician/manicurist.
114 (12)(13) INSTRUCTOR. A licensee who teaches in a
115 licensed or registered school of barbering or any branch of
116 cosmetology and completes any applicable requirements for
117 continuing education.
118 (13)(14) LICENSE. A document issued by the board which
119 entitles the holder to practice the profession listed on the
120 document.
121 (14)(15) LICENSEE. Any person holding a license issued
122 pursuant to this article.
123 (16) MAKEUP APPLICATION. The practice of applying
124 cosmetics to enhance the appearance of the face or skin,
125 including powder, foundation, rouge, eyeshadow, eyeliner,
126 mascara, and lipstick. The term includes the application of
127 makeup using an airbrush.
128 (15)(17) MANICURE. The practice of beautifying or
129 grooming the fingernails, toenails, adding nail tips,
130 extensions, gels, or massaging the hands, forearms, feet, or
131 lower legs of the general public for compensation.
132 (16)(19) MANICURIST. Any person, other than a student
133 or apprentice, who performs the practice of manicure on the
134 general public for compensation, and who shall
135 satisfysatisfies the qualifications and licensure requirements
136 provided in this article for a manicurist.
137 (17)(18) MANICURE/WAXING. A combination of the
138 practices of manicure and waxing.
139 (18)(20) MANICURIST/WAXER. Any person, other than a
140 student or apprentice, who performs a combination of the
Page 5

student or apprentice, who performs a combination of the
SB274 INTRODUCED
141 practices of manicure and waxing on the general public for
142 compensation, and who shall satisfysatisfies the
143 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
144 article for a manicurist/waxer.
145 (19)(21) NATURAL HAIR STYLING. The practice of
146 cleansing, weaving or interweaving, extending, locking,
147 braiding, or arranging the hair without cutting, coloring,
148 permanent waving, relaxing, removing, or chemical treatments.
149 (20)(22) NATURAL HAIRSTYLIST. Any person, other than a
150 student, who performs natural hair styling on the general
151 public for compensation, and who shall satisfysatisfies the
152 qualifications and licensure requirements provided in this
153 article for a natural hairstylist.
154 (21)(23) SCHOOL. An establishment licensed or
155 registered by the board to teach any or all of the practices
156 of barbering or cosmetology.
157 (22)(24) SHAMPOO ASSISTANT. Any person who is licensed
158 to perform only the practices of shampooing, cleansing, or
159 applying and cleansing temporary weekly color rinses to the
160 hair of the general public for compensation, and who shall
161 satisfysatisfies the qualifications and licensure requirements
162 provided in this article for a shampoo assistant.
163 (23)(25) SHOP. Any place where barbering or cosmetology
164 is practiced including, but not limited to, a mobile salon.
165 Only a properly licensed person, who is not an apprentice or a
166 student, may operate a shop.
167 (24)(26) STUDENT. Any person who is engaged in learning
168 any practice regulated by this article in a school licensed or
Page 6

any practice regulated by this article in a school licensed or
SB274 INTRODUCED
169 registered pursuant to this article, and who, as part of the
170 learning process, performs or assists in any practice
171 regulated by this article under the immediate supervision of
172 an instructor who is licensed pursuant to this article.
173 (25)(28) THREADING. The practice of eyebrow removal
174 with the use of a loop made of cotton or any other material.
175 (26)(27) THREADER. Any person engaged in the practice
176 of threading on the general public for compensation, and who
177 shall satisfysatisfies the qualifications and licensure
178 requirements provided in this article for a threader."
179 "§34-7B-13
180 This chapter does not apply to any of the following
181 persons, activities, or services:
182 (1) Service in the case of emergency or domestic
183 upheaval, without compensation.
184 (2) Licensed medical professionals operating within the
185 scope of their normal practice.
186 (3) Personnel of the United States armed servicesArmed
187 Services performing their ordinary duties.
188 (4) Any public trade school or other public school or
189 school program under the purview of the State Board of
190 Education or a local board of education.
191 (5) Any person who only occasionally dresses hair and
192 receivesfor no compensation therefor, or does any other act or
193 thing mentioned in this chapter, without holding himself or
194 herself out to the public as a provider of any practices
195 defined in this chapter for compensation.
196 (6) Departments in retail establishments where
Page 7

(6) Departments in retail establishments where
SB274 INTRODUCED
197 cosmetics are demonstrated and offered for sale but where no
198 other acts of cosmetology or barbering are performed.
199 (7) The licensees of any county or municipal barber
200 board or commission in existence on August 1, 2013, unless
201 such board or commission elects, by resolution adopted by the
202 governing body of the county or municipality, to come under
203 the provisions of this chapter.
204 (8) Any person who practices as a Class 1 barber.
205 (9) Any person who provides makeup application services
206 for compensation at any location if the person provides no
207 other barbering, cosmetology, or esthetics services.
208 (10) Any person who provides only blow-dry styling
209 services for compensation at any location if the person
210 provides no other barbering, cosmetology, or esthetics
211 services."
212 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
213 1, 2026.
Page 8